Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-292
Appeal.

An aggrieved party may secure a review of any final judgment of the district court under sections 79-288 to 79-291 by appeal as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 145;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,205;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 96.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

A party aggrieved by a district court's final judgment under the student suspension or expulsion act may appeal as provided in this section. Maack v. School Dist. of Lincoln, 241 Neb. 847, 491 N.W.2d 341 (1992).